Missouri, session 2026, SB1617.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.031, to read as
follows:
173.031. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Accountability for Low-Earning Outcome Degrees
in Higher Education Act of 2026".
2. The coordinating board for higher education shall:
(1) Adopt rules to prohibit state funds from being
allocated or expended, either directly or indirectly, for
academic degree programs that satisfy the definition of a
low-earning outcome program under Section 84001 of Pub. L.
119-21. These restrictions shall include, but are not
limited to, the following categories of higher education
funding:
(a) Individual student financial aid;
(b) Base operational or instructional funding;
(c) Separately or specially appropriated aid or
grants; and
(d) Capital or facilities funding;

SB 1617 2
(2) Annually review updated federal determinations of
low-earning outcome programs under Section 84001 of Pub. L.
119-21 and adopt rules in accordance with subdivision (1) of
this subsection; and
(3) Submit an annual and publicly available report to
the general assembly documenting:
(a) Programs prohibited from receiving state aid under
this section;
(b) Enforcement of such prohibitions; and
(c) The estimated fiscal impact due to the
prohibitions.
✓